New York, session 2025-2026, A4334.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The multiple dwelling law is amended by adding a new 2 section 302-d to read as follows: 3 § 302-d. Provisions relating to multiple dwellings with submetering. 4 1. Any tenant residing in a building which is subject to submetering of 5 utilities shall receive a reduction in rent which is equal to the amount 6 of the utility costs for which such tenant is responsible, where such 7 costs were previously included in such tenant's rent. 8 2. The division of housing and community renewal shall, within ninety 9 days of the effective date of this section, review the standard and 10 actual rent reductions for submetered properties and shall require 11 increases where the division determines necessary. The division shall 12 develop a process for tenants to appeal their rent reduction if it does 13 not accurately reflect the amount they are required to pay for subme- 14 tered utilities. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01656-01-5